Washington statutes.
RCW 4.22.925

Applicability— 1981 c 27 s 17.

In accordance with section 15(1), chapter 27, Laws of 1981, the repeal of RCW 4.22.010 by section 17, chapter 27, Laws of 1981 applies only to claims arising on or after July 26, 1981. RCW 4.22.010 shall continue to apply to claims arising prior to July 26, 1981.

[ 1982 c 100 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 100: See note following RCW 4.22.040.